Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 29A.32.010 and 2024 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The secretary of state shall((, whenever at least one statewide measure or office is scheduled to appear on the general election ballot,)) print and distribute a voters' pamphlet prior to the primary in each even-numbered year and prior to the general election every year.The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other locations the secretary deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall also produce recorded or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet, publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any person who requests one.The secretary of state may make the material required to be distributed by this chapter available to the public in electronic form. The secretary of state may provide the material in electronic form to web-based, print, and broadcast news media and similar services at the cost of reproduction or transmission of the data.Sec. 2. RCW 29A.32.210 and 2024 c 78 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Before any primary or general election, or any special election held under RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, each county auditor shall print and distribute a local voters' pamphlet. The pamphlet shall provide information on all measures and candidates appearing on ballots within that county except measures and candidates appearing in a voters' pamphlet produced by the secretary of state under RCW 29A.32.010 and 29A.32.031. The format of any local voters' pamphlet shall, whenever applicable, comply with the provisions of this chapter regarding the publication of the state candidates' and voters' pamphlets.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---